Washington statutes.
RCW 44.05.900

Contingent effective date—1983 c 16.

This act shall take effect if the proposed amendment to Article II of the state Constitution establishing a commission for state legislative and congressional redistricting is validly submitted to and is approved and ratified by the voters at a general election held in November, 1983. If the proposed amendment is not so approved and ratified, this act shall be null and void in its entirety.

[ 1983 c 16 s 18.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: Senate Joint Resolution No. 103, requiring redistricting commissions and plans, was approved by the voters November 8, 1983, and is codified as Article II, section 43 of the state Constitution.